Florida, session 2026, HB1115.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 1009.8963, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1115 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1115, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
1009.8963 The Genetic Counseling Education Enhancement
Grant Program.—
(1) The Genetic Counseling Education Enhancement Grant
Program is created within the State University System to support
the development, growth, and sustainability of graduate level
genetic counseling programs accredited by a recognized
accrediting body. The Board of Governors shall award competitive
grants to state universities to address faculty shortages,
student financial barriers, and clinical training needs in
genetic counseling.
(2) Subject to appropriation, the board shall award funds
to:
(a) Establish an accredited program at a state university
through a one-time start-up grant based upon an application
submitted in a format prescribed by the board. The application
must include:
1. A detailed plan demonstrating how grant funds will be
used to achieve program accreditation.
2. The projected outcomes of establishing the program,
including all of the following:
a. The anticipated program enrollment.
b. The plan for hiring and retaining faculty for the
program.
c. The anticipated program completion rates.
d. The anticipated first-time American Board of Genetic
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1115 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1115, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
Counseling board certification examination passage rates.
e. The anticipated program contributions to the state's
genetic counseling workforce.
3. Documentation demonstrating that the proposed program
is supported by sufficient clinical training capacity consistent
with nationally recognized accreditation standards, and that the
proposed growth represents a net increase in statewide training
opportunities rather than a redistribution of existing
supervision resources.
(b) Accredited programs based on program performance
according to the following metrics:
1. The number of students completing the genetic
counseling program.
2. The first-time American Board of Genetic Counseling
board certification examination passage rate for students
completing the state university's genetic counseling program.

The program shall reward excellence among genetic counseling
programs with an average first-time American Board of Genetic
Counseling board certification examination passage rate above
the national average.
(3)(a) Grant funds provided through the program must be
used for:
1. The recruitment and retention of qualified faculty,
including, but not limited to, salaries, professional
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1115 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1115, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
development, and incentives.
2. Financial assistance to students enrolled in the
accredited program. Such financial assistance must be in the
form of scholarships that cover tuition, required books and
materials, and reasonable living expenses.
3. The establishment and maintenance of clinical rotations
required for completion of the master's degree in genetic
counseling, including partnerships with health care facilities
for supervised practicum experiences, simulation training
resources, and faculty oversight.
(b) Grant funds may not be used for:
1. General administrative overhead costs.
2. The construction of new facilities.
3. Nonprogram-related activities.
(c) State universities that receive a grant through the
program must maintain records sufficient to demonstrate
compliance with this subsection.
(4)(a) Each state university receiving funds pursuant to
this section shall submit an annual report to the board. The
report must include:
1. Expenditures.
2. The outcomes achieved using grant funds.
3. Plans for the upcoming fiscal year for the program.
(b) The board shall annually compile the reports into a
100 statewide summary. The summary must be submitted to the
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1115 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1115, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
101 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the
102 House of Representatives by July 1 of each year.
103 (5) The Board of Governors shall adopt regulations to
104 administer this section.
105 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1115 -02-er